Illinois, session 104th, HB3596.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Illinois, 3represented in the General Assembly: 4    Section 1. Short title. This Act may be cited as the 5Wetlands Protection Act. 6    Section 5. Findings and intent. The General Assembly 7finds:8    (1) In 1818, Illinois contained an estimated 8.2 million 9acres of wetlands. Based on the Illinois portion of the 10National Wetlands Inventory, less than 9% of those original 11acres of wetlands remain.12    (2) As a result of the significant loss in wetland 13acreage, there has been a corresponding loss in the functional 14values and benefits that wetlands provide.15    (3) Illinois is bordered by 880 miles of rivers, which are 16critical to navigation, commerce, recreation, and ecosystem 17health at home and downstream to the Gulf of Mexico, and the 18health of Illinois rivers is heavily influenced by the health 19of the tributaries and streams that flow into them.20    (4) In Illinois, 9,894 total miles of streams provide 21water for surface water intakes, supplying public drinking 22water systems that rely at least in part on intermittent, 23ephemeral, or headwater streams.  HB3596- 2 -LRB104 09762 BDA 19828 b1    (5) Continued loss of Illinois' wetlands and streams may 2deprive the People of the State of some or all of the benefits 3that they provide, including:4        (A) reducing flood damages and protecting vulnerable 5    communities by absorbing, storing, and conveying peak 6    flows from storms;7        (B) improving water quality by serving as 8    sedimentation and filtering basins and as natural 9    biological treatment areas;10        (C) providing breeding, nesting, foraging, and 11    protective habitat for approximately 40% of the State's 12    threatened and endangered plants and animals, in addition 13    to other forms of fish, wildlife, game, waterfowl, and 14    shorebirds;15        (D) protecting underground water resources and helping 16    to recharge rivers, streams, and local or regional 17    underground water supplies;18        (E) serving as recreational areas for hunting, 19    fishing, boating, hiking, bird watching, photography, and 20    other uses;21        (F) providing open space and aesthetic values, 22    particularly in rapidly developing areas; 23        (G) providing unique educational and research 24    opportunities because of their high diversity of plants 25    and animals, their support for a high incidence of 26    threatened and endangered species, and their function as a   HB3596- 3 -LRB104 09762 BDA 19828 b1    natural buffer for rivers, lakes, and streams;2        (H) supplying nutrients in freshwater food cycles and 3    serving as nursery areas and sanctuaries for young fish; 4    and5        (I) helping to protect shorelines from the forces of 6    water erosion.7    (6) Our changing climate and its more extreme and less 8predictable weather patterns heighten the need for some or all 9of the benefits that Illinois' wetlands provide, including 10flood control, coastal resilience, water quality, aquifer 11recharge, habitat, and maintenance of baseflow to recharge 12rivers, streams, and local or regional underground water 13supplies.14    (7) Illinois historically relied on the federal Clean 15Water Act's permit program administered by the U.S. Army Corps 16of Engineers and the U.S. Environmental Protection Agency to 17prevent harm to aquatic resources from unauthorized discharges 18of dredge or fill material.19    (8) After rejection of the 1989 Wetland Delineation Manual 20and in light of uncertainty about federal protections for some 21"isolated" wetlands, the General Assembly passed the 22Interagency Wetland Policy Act of 1989 to protect these 23wetlands from State agency actions and achieve no net loss of 24wetlands.25    (9) The Supreme Court's May 25, 2023 decision in Sackett 26v. EPA rolled back the scope of waters of the United States,   HB3596- 4 -LRB104 09762 BDA 19828 b1thereby removing federal Clean Water Act protections for many 2waters of the United States, including wetlands that provide 3significant flood control protections, such as bottomland 4hardwood forested wetlands that are separated from the 5Illinois River by levees.6    (10) It is important for Illinois to adopt protections 7under State law to reinstate protections lost by rolling back 8the scope of the federal Clean Water Act. 9    Section 10. Definitions. As used in this Act:10    "Adjacent" means bordering, contiguous, or neighboring.11    "Adjacent wetlands" includes wetlands separated from 12waters of the United States by man-made dikes or barriers, 13natural river berms, beach dunes, and other man-made or 14natural structures.15    "Affected property" means any property upon which a 16regulated activity is conducted.17    "Agency" means the Illinois Environmental Protection 18Agency.19    "Approved county or district" means a county or special 20district with a stormwater program that has been approved 21under Section 55 to issue permits under this Act instead of the 22Department of Natural Resources.23    "Approved wetland specialist" means a person who has met 24the educational, training, and field experience requirements 25that have been adopted, by rule, under this Act or set forth in   HB3596- 5 -LRB104 09762 BDA 19828 b1an approved county or district code and that assure 2knowledgeable wetland delineations using the Corps of 3Engineers Wetland Delineation Manual in a manner that is 4consistent with subsection (f) of Section 25 of this Act.5    "Avoidance" means any action that is taken in a manner 6that will cause a regulated activity not to occur and that is 7consistent with the federal Clean Water Act 404(b)(1) 8Guidelines developed by the U.S. Environmental Protection 9Agency and the U.S. Army Corps of Engineers.10    "Bog" means a peat-accumulating wetland that has no 11significant inflows or outflows and that supports acidophilic 12mosses, particularly sphagnum, resulting in highly acidic 13conditions.14    "Bottomland hardwood" means forested riverine floodplain 15forest, including flatwoods in northeastern Illinois, that are 16located in the 100-year flood plain of Illinois rivers and 17streams and that are at least seasonally flooded.18    "Class I wetland" means a top tier wetland as indicated by 19type (such as bog, bottomland hardwood forest, or panne), 20designation (such as Ramsar wetland of international 21importance), or function (such as threatened or endangered 22species habitat or important flood protection) consistent with 23Section 25 of this Act. Class I wetlands do not include waters 24of the United States.25    "Class II wetland" means a wetland, including its 26contiguous area, that is larger than 0.5 acres and is not a   HB3596- 6 -LRB104 09762 BDA 19828 b1Class I wetland. Class II wetlands do not include waters of the 2United States.3    "Class III wetland" means a wetland, including its 4contiguous area, that is between 0.1 acres and 0.5 acres and is 5not a Class I wetland. Class III wetlands do not include waters 6of the United States.7    "Commercial battery energy storage system" means a type of 8energy storage system that uses batteries to store and 9distribute energy in the form of electricity for the primary 10purpose of wholesale or retail sale and is not intended 11primarily for use on the property on which the device or 12devices reside.13    "Commercial solar energy facility" means a "commercial 14solar energy system" as defined in Section 10-720 of the 15Illinois Property Tax Code.16    "Contiguous area" means the portion of a wetland that 17extends beyond the property boundary of the affected property.18    "Corps of Engineers" means the U.S. Army Corps of 19Engineers.20    "Corps of Engineers Wetlands Delineation Manual" means the 211987 U.S. Army Corps of Engineers, Wetlands Delineation 22Manual, Research Program Technical Report Y-87-1, and any 23applicable Regional Supplements thereto in effect May 24, 242023.25    "Cypress swamp" means forested, permanent, or 26semi-permanent bodies of water, with species assemblages   HB3596- 7 -LRB104 09762 BDA 19828 b1characteristic of the Gulf of Mexico and Southeastern Coastal 2Plains and including bald cypress, which are typically found 3in far southern Illinois.4    "Department" means the Department of Natural Resources.5    "Director" means the Director of Natural Resources.6    "Discharge" means any addition of dredged or fill material 7into, including redeposit of dredged material other than 8incidental fallback within, State jurisdictional wetlands.9    "Dredged material" means material that is excavated or 10dredged from waters of the U.S. and waters of the State.11    "Fen" means a wetland fed by an alkaline water source, 12such as a calcareous spring or seep.13    "Fill material" means material placed in a State 14jurisdictional wetland where the material has the effect of 15replacing any portion of a State jurisdictional wetland with 16dry land or changing the bottom elevation of any portion of a 17State jurisdictional wetland.18    "General permit" means a permit issued by an approved 19county or district, or the Department, in a manner that is 20authorized under Section 40 of this Act. "General permit" 21includes a U.S. Army Corps of Engineers nationwide permit.22    "High-Quality Aquatic Resources" or "HQAR" means 23high-quality aquatic resources consistent with the guidelines 24of the Chicago District of the U.S. Army Corps of Engineers or 25approved county or district codes.26    "Individual permit" means a permit issued by the   HB3596- 8 -LRB104 09762 BDA 19828 b1Department under Section 25 of this Act after case-specific 2sequenced review (avoidance, minimization, mitigation) of the 3proposed project and certification of compliance with State 4water quality standards.5    "In lieu fee mitigation" means a payment to an approved in 6lieu fee program made by a permittee to satisfy a mitigation 7requirement in accordance with this Act and implementing 8rules.9    "Maintenance" means work to repair and keep in good 10working order existing structures in wetlands, including 11emergency reconstruction of recently damaged parts of 12currently serviceable structures, including dikes, dams, 13levees, groins, riprap, breakwaters, causeways, and bridge 14abutments or approaches, and transportation structures. 15"Maintenance" does not include any modification that changes 16the character, scope, or size of the original fill design but 17such a modification may be eligible to use Nationwide Permit 183, Maintenance.19    "Metropolitan Water Reclamation District" or "district" 20means a special district organized under the Metropolitan 21Water Reclamation District Act.22    "Minimization" means reducing, as much as practicable, the 23adverse environmental impact of an unavoidable regulated 24activity in a manner that is consistent with this Act and the 25federal Clean Water Act 404(b)(1) Guidelines developed by the 26U.S. Environmental Protection Agency and the U.S. Army Corps   HB3596- 9 -LRB104 09762 BDA 19828 b1of Engineers.2    "Mitigation" means the restoration, establishment, 3enhancement, or protection and maintenance of wetlands and 4other aquatic resources for the purpose of compensating for 5unavoidable adverse impacts that remain after all appropriate 6and practicable avoidance and minimization have been achieved. 7Mitigation must be consistent with the requirements of this 8Act. Mitigation may include wetlands creation if authorized by 9the Department in situations in which other mitigation is 10impractical and the likelihood of success is high. Wetland 11creation is restricted to areas that are currently 12non-wetlands.13    "Mitigation bank" means a site, or suite of sites, where 14aquatic resources, such as wetlands, streams, wetland buffers, 15and riparian areas, are restored, established, enhanced, or 16preserved for the purpose of providing compensatory mitigation 17for impacts authorized by permits under this Act. 18    "Nationwide permit" means a nationwide permit issued by 19the U.S. Army Corps of Engineers as of the effective date of 20this Act.21    "Navigable water" means traditionally navigable waters 22that were historically navigable, are presently navigable, or 23are susceptible to future navigable use. Navigable water also 24includes interstate waters (including interstate wetlands), 25impoundments of traditionally navigable waters and interstate 26waters (including interstate wetlands), and tributaries.   HB3596- 10 -LRB104 09762 BDA 19828 b1    "Ordinary high water mark" means that line on the shore 2established by the fluctuations of water and indicated by 3physical characteristics, such as a clear, natural line 4impressed on the bank, shelving, changes in the character of 5soil, destruction of terrestrial vegetation, the presence of 6litter and debris, or other appropriate means that consider 7the characteristics of the surrounding areas. 8    "Panne" means wet interdunal flats located near Lake 9Michigan. "Panne" includes dune and swale wetlands.10    "Permit" means a written authorization issued by the 11Department of Natural Resources under this Act and 12implementing rules. "Permit" includes general permits and 13individual permits.14    "Person" means an individual, partnership, co-partnership, 15firm, company, limited liability company, corporation, 16association, joint-stock company, trust, estate, political 17subdivision, state or federal agency or other legal entity, or 18its legal representative, employee, agent or assigns.19    "Preconstruction notification" means notice that a 20permittee must provide the Department before undertaking an 21activity authorized by a general permit.22    "Prior converted cropland" means a wetland that was 23converted to agricultural use before December 23, 1985, that 24had an agricultural commodity produced on it at least once 25before December 23, 1985, that remains available for 26agricultural commodity production, and that, as of December   HB3596- 11 -LRB104 09762 BDA 19828 b123, 1985, did not support woody vegetation and met the 2following hydrologic criteria for a farmed wetland: (i) 3inundation was less than 15 consecutive days during the 4growing season or 10% of the growing season, whichever is 5less, in most years (50% chance or more); and (ii) if a 6pothole, ponding was less than 7 consecutive days during the 7growing season in most years (50% chance or more) and 8saturation was less than 14 consecutive days during the 9growing season most years (50% chance or more). However, if 10the prior converted cropland is changed out of agricultural 11use (including conservation) and the area reverts to a 12wetland, the area may become subject to this Act under Section 1315.14    "Regulated activity" means the discharge of dredged or 15fill material into a State jurisdictional wetland subject to 16this Act.17    "Renewable energy facility" means (i) a commercial solar 18energy facility or commercial battery energy storage system; 19or (ii) supporting facilities. Supporting facilities mean 20transmission lines, substations, access roads, meteorological 21towers, storage containers, and equipment associated with the 22generation and storage of electricity by a commercial solar 23energy facility.24    "Significant nexus" means connectivity or nexus to 25maintaining the chemical, physical, or biological integrity of 26navigable waters.   HB3596- 12 -LRB104 09762 BDA 19828 b1    "State jurisdictional wetland" means a wetland that is 2protected by the requirements of this Act and is identified 3consistent with Department rules adopted under Section 40 of 4this Act. State jurisdictional wetlands are adjacent to or 5otherwise have a significant nexus to maintaining the 6chemical, physical, or biological integrity of navigable 7waters. A State jurisdictional wetland does not include waters 8of the United States.9    "Threatened or endangered species" means those species 10that have been designated as threatened or endangered under 11the Illinois Endangered Species Protection Act and those 12species that have been listed as threatened or endangered 13under the federal Endangered Species Act.14    "Upland" means non-wetland, dry land.15    "Voluntary aquatic habitat restoration project" means 16activities that are voluntarily undertaken (not as required 17mitigation) to restore, reestablish, rehabilitate, or enhance 18altered, degraded, or former aquatic habitats that result in a 19net increase in aquatic habitat functions and services 20consistent with historic, pre-disturbance functions and 21services of the aquatic habitat.22    "Wetlands" means those areas that are inundated or 23saturated by surface or groundwater at a frequency and 24duration sufficient to support, and that under normal 25circumstances do support, a prevalence of vegetation typically 26adapted for life in saturated soil conditions. "Wetlands"   HB3596- 13 -LRB104 09762 BDA 19828 b1includes areas that are delineated in accordance with the 2Corps of Engineers Wetland Delineation Manual. 3    Section 15. Exemptions.4    (a) Consistent with Section 404(f) of the federal Clean 5Water Act, as long as they do not have as their purpose 6bringing a wetland into a use to which it was not previously 7subject where the flow or circulation of navigable waters may 8be impaired or the reach of such waters be reduced and do not 9entail discharge of toxic pollutants consistent with Section 10307 of the Clean Water Act, the following activities are not 11prohibited by or otherwise subject to regulation under this 12Act:13        (1) Normal farming, silviculture, and ranching 14    activities, including plowing, seeding, cultivating, minor 15    drainage, and harvesting for the production of food, 16    fiber, and forest products, or upland soil and water 17    conservation practices.18        (2) Maintenance, including emergency reconstruction of 19    recently damaged parts, of currently serviceable 20    structures, such as dikes, dams, levees, groins, riprap, 21    breakwaters, causeways, bridge abutments or approaches, 22    and transportation structures. Maintenance does not 23    include any modification that changes the character, 24    scope, or size of the original fill design. Emergency 25    reconstruction must occur within a reasonable period of   HB3596- 14 -LRB104 09762 BDA 19828 b1    time after damage occurs in order to qualify for this 2    exemption.3        (3) Construction or maintenance of farm or stock ponds 4    or irrigation ditches, or the maintenance (but not 5    construction) of drainage ditches. Discharge associated 6    with siphons, pumps, headgates, wingwalls, weirs, 7    diversion structures, and such other facilities as are 8    appurtenant and functionally related to irrigation and 9    ditches are included in this definition.10        (4) Construction of temporary sedimentation basins on 11    a construction site which does not include any regulated 12    activities within a wetland. As used in this paragraph, 13    the term "construction site" means any site involving the 14    erection of buildings, roads, and other discrete 15    structures and the installation of support facilities 16    necessary for construction and utilization of such 17    structures. "Construction site" also includes any other 18    land areas which involve land-disturbing excavation 19    activities, including quarrying or other mining 20    activities, where an increase in the runoff of sediment is 21    controlled through the use of temporary sedimentation 22    basins.23        (5) Construction or maintenance of farm roads or 24    forest roads or temporary roads for moving mining 25    equipment, where such roads are constructed and 26    maintained, in accordance with best management practices,   HB3596- 15 -LRB104 09762 BDA 19828 b1    to assure that flow and circulation patterns and chemical 2    and biological characteristics of the wetland are not 3    impaired, that the reach of the wetland is not reduced, 4    and that any adverse effect on the aquatic environment 5    will be otherwise minimized.6        (6) Activities for the placement of pilings for linear 7    projects, including bridges, elevated walkways, and power 8    line structures in accordance with best management 9    practices, to assure that the flow and circulation 10    patterns and chemical and biological characteristics of 11    the wetland are not impaired, that the reach of the 12    wetland is not reduced, and that any adverse effect on the 13    aquatic environment will be otherwise minimized.14    (b) Any exemption that is authorized by and pertaining to 15wetlands that are subject to regulation under the federal 16Clean Water Act, or regulations promulgated thereunder, at the 17time of enactment of this Act, shall also be an exemption for 18the purpose of this Act.19    (c) The following are exempt from regulation as State 20jurisdictional wetlands under this Act:21        (1) Waste treatment systems, including treatment ponds 22    or lagoons designed to meet the requirements of the 23    federal Clean Water Act and comply with State water 24    quality standards.25        (2) Prior converted cropland unless there has been a 26    change in use out of agricultural or conservation use and   HB3596- 16 -LRB104 09762 BDA 19828 b1    the area reverts to a wetland.2        (3) Ditches (including roadside ditches) excavated 3    wholly in and draining only dry land and that do not carry 4    a relatively permanent flow of water.5        (4) An artificially irrigated area that would revert 6    to upland if the irrigation ceased. This shall also 7    include the pumping of water for purposes of waterfowl 8    hunting or creating waterfowl habitat.9        (5) An artificial lake or pond created by excavating 10    or diking upland to collect and retain water and which are 11    used exclusively for such purposes as stock watering, 12    irrigation, settling basins, or rice growing. 13        (6) Artificial reflecting or swimming pools or other 14    small ornamental bodies of water created by excavating or 15    diking dry land to retain water for primarily aesthetic 16    reasons. 17        (7) A water-filled depression created in dry land 18    incidental to construction activity and pits excavated in 19    dry land for the purpose of obtaining fill, sand, or 20    gravel unless and until the construction or excavation 21    operation is abandoned and the resulting water body meets 22    the definition of "waters of the State" consistent with 23    the Environmental Protection Act, including Section 3.550 24    of the Environmental Protection Act.25        (8) Swales and erosional features, including gullies, 26    rills, and small washes, characterized by low volume,   HB3596- 17 -LRB104 09762 BDA 19828 b1    infrequent, or short duration flow. 2        (9) Wetlands created by the construction of stormwater 3    facilities in upland areas, provided that the facility was 4    not created for the purpose of wetland mitigation.5    (d) Any activity with respect to which a county or special 6district has an approved program under Section 55 of this Act.  7    Section 20. Applicability. 8    (a) The requirements of this Act apply to all State 9jurisdictional wetlands as that term is defined in this Act. 10If a wetland ceases to meet that definition because it becomes 11subject to regulation under the federal Clean Water Act, it 12shall no longer be subject to the provisions of this Act. The 13Department may enter into an agreement with the Corps of 14Engineers to coordinate the permit program under this Act with 15the Corps of Engineers permit program under Section 404 of the 16federal Clean Water Act. 17    (b) The following are presumed to be adjacent or have a 18significant nexus to maintaining the chemical, physical, or 19biological integrity of a navigable water and as such are 20State jurisdictional wetlands for purposes of this Act: 21        (1) wetlands that are wholly or partially located 22    within 100 feet of the ordinary high water mark of a 23    navigable water, interstate water, or tributary; 24        (2) wetlands that are wholly or partially located in 25    the 100-year floodplain and are within 1,500 feet of the   HB3596- 18 -LRB104 09762 BDA 19828 b1    ordinary high water mark of a navigable water, interstate 2    water, or tributary; 3        (3) wetlands that are wholly or partially within 1,500 4    feet of the ordinary high water mark of Lake Michigan; or 5        (4) wetlands that have a visible surface water or a 6    regular shallow subsurface water connection to a navigable 7    water. 8    (c) An affected property owner or developer may introduce 9information that is relevant to demonstrate that a particular 10wetland is not a State jurisdictional wetland, thereby 11rebutting the presumption in subsection (b). The Department 12shall consider information presented to rebut the presumption 13and determine whether the presumption has been rebutted. If 14the Department determines that the presumption is rebutted and 15the wetland is not a jurisdictional wetland for the purpose of 16this Act, the wetland shall not be subject to this Act. 17    Section 25. Regulated activities; individual permits; 18wetland classification; mitigation; delineation.19    (a) No person may discharge dredged or fill material into 20a State jurisdictional wetland protected by this Act except in 21accordance with the terms of an individual or general permit 22issued by the Department under this Section or Section 30 of 23this Act. This subsection (a) becomes effective on the date 24the Department adopts rules under Section 40 of this Act.25    (b) No permit shall be required under this Act, and the   HB3596- 19 -LRB104 09762 BDA 19828 b1requirements of the Act shall not apply to, renewable energy 2facility construction, maintenance, repair, improvement, or 3reconstruction that commenced construction before the 4effective date of rules adopted under Section 40 of this Act. 5For purposes of this subsection, "commenced construction" 6means:7        (1) to have begun a continuous program of on-site 8    physical construction, such as the placement, assembly, or 9    installation of facilities or equipment or the conducting 10    of site preparation work, including clearing, excavation, 11    or removal of existing structures;12        (2) to have submitted a binding application or bid to 13    the Illinois Power Agency to execute a Renewable Energy 14    Credit Contract under Section 1-75 of the Illinois Power 15    Agency Act;16        (3) to have entered into a binding contractual 17    agreement for the purchase and sale of electricity; or18        (4) to have obtained municipal or county siting 19    approval, a special use permit, or building approval.20    (c) Wetlands shall be classified as follows:21        (1) The Department shall classify a wetland as Class I 22    if the wetland:23            (A) is or encompasses a bog, bottomland hardwood 24        forest, fen, panne, or cypress swamp;25            (B) has been designated a Ramsar wetland of 26        international importance under the Convention on   HB3596- 20 -LRB104 09762 BDA 19828 b1        Wetlands;2            (C) is designated for important flood protection 3        services under paragraph (3);4            (D) is occupied or suitable habitat for a 5        threatened or endangered species listed under State or 6        federal law;7            (E) has a Floristic Quality Index that is equal to 8        or greater than 20 or a mean coefficient of 9        conservatism (Mean C) equal to or greater than 3.5, 10        determined in accordance with rules adopted by the 11        Department; or12            (F) is a High-Quality Aquatic Resource.13        (2) The Department shall classify a non-Class I 14    wetland as a Class II wetland if the wetland, including 15    its contiguous area, is larger than 0.5 acres. However, if 16    a non-Class I wetland is smaller than 0.5 acres it shall be 17    designated a Class III wetland. If a Class III wetland is 18    1/10th of an acre or smaller, there is no permit required.19        (3) The Department may, in consultation with the 20    Illinois Emergency Management Agency and Office of 21    Homeland Security, the Federal Emergency Management Agency 22    or local authorities, designate a wetland as a Class I 23    wetland due to important flood protection services 24    protecting human life and property if the wetland is no 25    longer protected under the federal Clean Water Act. 26    (c) Mitigation shall be required in accordance with this   HB3596- 21 -LRB104 09762 BDA 19828 b1Act for permitted activities and shall be conducted according 2to the following preferred order:3        (1) Discharges impacting Class I wetlands shall be 4    mitigated through either on-site mitigation or off-site 5    mitigation at an approved wetland mitigation bank within 6    the same watershed as the location of the proposed fill. 7    Mitigation shall be in kind, restoring to the maximum 8    degree practicable, as determined by the Department, both 9    the type and functions of the wetland that will be 10    affected by the regulated activity. The mitigation ratio 11    shall be 5:1 unless the Director, for good cause shown and 12    on a case-by-case basis, authorizes a higher mitigation 13    ratio not to exceed 6:1 or a lower mitigation ratio not 14    less than 4:1. In lieu fee mitigation may be used for 15    mitigation when there are no available mitigation credits 16    within the watershed.17        (2) Discharges impacting Class II wetlands shall be 18    mitigated through either on-site mitigation or off-site 19    mitigation at an approved wetland mitigation bank within 20    the same watershed as the location of the proposed fill. 21    Mitigation shall be in kind, restoring to the maximum 22    degree practicable as determined by the Department, both 23    the type and functions of the wetland that will be 24    affected by the regulated activity. The mitigation ratio 25    shall be 3:1 unless the Director, for good cause shown and 26    on a case-by-case basis, authorizes a higher mitigation   HB3596- 22 -LRB104 09762 BDA 19828 b1    ratio not to exceed 3.5:1 or a lower mitigation ratio not 2    less than 2.5:1. In lieu fee mitigation may be used for 3    mitigation when there are no available mitigation credits 4    within the watershed.5        (3) Discharges impacting Class III wetlands shall be 6    mitigated through either participation in an approved 7    wetland mitigation bank or an approved in-lieu fee 8    program, unless the Department for good cause requires in 9    kind on-site mitigation or off-site mitigation at an 10    approved mitigation bank. The mitigation ratio shall be 11    1.5:1 for compensation through an approved wetland 12    mitigation bank and 2:1 for compensation through an 13    approved in-lieu fee program. The Director, for good cause 14    shown and on a case-by-case basis, may authorize a higher 15    or lower mitigation ratio.16    (d) Persons seeking a permit are responsible for wetland 17delineation and classification made by or under the 18supervision of an approved wetland specialist. Wetland 19delineations shall be made in accordance with the Corps of 20Engineers Wetland Delineation Manual. Classifications shall be 21in accordance with this Section or an approved program under 22Section 55. Delineations by the Corps of Engineers, by 23approved counties, or by Corps of Engineers approved agencies 24shall be honored.25    (e) Persons seeking an individual permit shall provide the 26Department with a complete application, including, at a   HB3596- 23 -LRB104 09762 BDA 19828 b1minimum, the following items: (i) a map of the area that will 2be affected by the activity, including wetland and water 3boundaries for the areas affected and the existing uses and 4structures; (ii) a wetland delineation made in accordance with 5the Corps of Engineers Wetland Delineation Manual by or under 6the supervision of an approved wetland specialist and this 7Section; (iii) a description of the proposed activity, 8including its purpose, the location and dimensions of any 9structures, grading or fills, drainage, roads, sewers and 10water supply, parking lots, stormwater facilities, discharge 11of pollutants and on-site waste disposal; (iv) a description 12of any public benefit to be derived from the proposed project; 13(v) a description of avoidance, minimization, and mitigation, 14including a mitigation plan; and (vi) the names and addresses 15of adjacent landowners as determined by the current tax 16assessment rolls. The Department shall notify the applicant 17within 20 business days if the permit application is 18incomplete and provide a reasonable time for the applicant to 19correct deficiencies in the permit application. Within 90 20business days of receipt of a complete permit application, the 21Department shall either issue the permit, deny the permit, or 22issue the permit with conditions. All individual permit 23decisions are subject to public comment. If a public hearing 24is held, the deadline to make a permit determination is 25extended by 45 business days.26    (f) The Department shall evaluate individual permit   HB3596- 24 -LRB104 09762 BDA 19828 b1requests through the following sequence: (i) avoidance of 2impacts to aquatic resources if a less environmentally 3damaging practicable alternative exists; (ii) minimization of 4unavoidable impacts by taking appropriate and practicable 5steps such as reduction of the footprint of the fill; (iii) 6compensatory mitigation for any remaining impacts to aquatic 7resources in accordance with this Act. The Department shall 8not issue an individual permit pursuant to this Section unless 9the Agency has certified to the Department that the proposed 10activity will not cause or contribute to a violation of a State 11water quality standard. The Agency shall, within 80 business 12days of receipt of a complete application, approve, deny, or 13approve with conditions the water quality certification. The 14applicant for a permit may mutually agree to extend the 80-day 15deadline up to an additional 80 business days in which the 16Agency must take final action on the water quality 17certification under this paragraph. If the Agency does not 18approve, deny, or approve with conditions the water quality 19certification within the extended time period, the 20certification requirements shall be waived and the Department 21may issue their permit decision consistent with the sections 22of this Act.23    (g) Upon request by an applicant, the Department may issue 24an after-the-fact permit if the Department determines that the 25activities covered by the after-the-fact permit were 26undertaken and conducted in response to emergency   HB3596- 25 -LRB104 09762 BDA 19828 b1circumstances that constituted an imminent threat to persons, 2public infrastructure, personal property, or uninterrupted 3utility service. The request for an after-the-fact permit must 4be made as soon as reasonably possible after the event. The 5Department shall require compensatory mitigation. If the 6Department for good cause shown denies an after-the-fact 7permit, the applicant shall be in violation of this Act. 8However, the applicant and Department may, through mutual 9agreement, provide for compensatory mitigation, restoration, 10or other measures to resolve the violation. In such an 11instance, the applicant may appeal the denial of an 12after-the-fact permit consistent with the appeals procedures 13in this Act.14    (h) The permit applicant and the Department may waive or 15extend the permit deadlines in this Section through mutual 16agreement. If the Department is unable to comply with the 17permit deadlines and they are not waived or extended through 18mutual agreement, the permit application will be denied 19without prejudice.  20    Section 30. General permits.21    (a) Notwithstanding Section 25, any person who intends to 22conduct a regulated activity within the State may do so in 23accordance with a general permit issued by the Department 24under this Section. A general permit pre-authorizes a category 25of activities that are similar in nature and impact on water   HB3596- 26 -LRB104 09762 BDA 19828 b1quality, will have only minimal adverse effects when performed 2separately, will have minimal cumulative impacts on water 3quality provided the permittee complies with all of the 4conditions of the general permit, and will not cause or 5contribute to a violation of State water quality standards.6    (b) Permits for all categories of activities, subject to 7the same permit limitations and conditions, that are the 8subject of a nationwide permit issued by the Corps of 9Engineers, in effect on the date of the enactment of this Act, 10are adopted as general permits covering regulated activities 11subject to this Act. Notwithstanding the foregoing, all such 12permits will include a preconstruction notification 13requirement and compensatory mitigation, unless the permit 14states compensatory mitigation is not required because the 15work is designed to improve water quality or, with respect to 16voluntary aquatic habitat restoration, to provide net increase 17in wetland function. In any case, compensatory mitigation is 18not required for impacts below 1/10 of an acre.19    (c) The Department may, through rulemaking in accordance 20with the Illinois Administrative Procedure Act, adopt general 21permits covering activities not covered by general permits 22under subsection (b) of this Section if the Department 23determines that the activities in the category would be 24subject to the same permit limitations and conditions and will 25cause only minimal adverse environmental effects when 26performed separately, will have only minimal cumulative   HB3596- 27 -LRB104 09762 BDA 19828 b1adverse effect on the environment, will not cause or 2contribute to a violation of State water quality standards 3when performed separately, and will have only a minimal 4cumulative adverse effect on water quality. The Department 5shall prescribe best management practices for any general 6permit issued under this Section. The Department shall include 7compensatory mitigation requirements in general permits for 8impacts that exceed 1/10 of an acre.9    (d) The Department shall adopt a general permit for:10        (1) construction or maintenance of access roads for 11    utility lines, substations, or related equipment or 12    facilities with adequate culverts, bridges, or other 13    structures to provide freshwater connectivity and passage 14    for fish or other aquatic life;15        (2) activities for the purpose of preserving and 16    enhancing aviation safety or to prevent an airport hazard; 17    and18        (3) conservation activities, such as voluntary aquatic 19    habitat restoration and fish passage.20    The Department shall develop the general permit under 21paragraph (3) in consultation with local, state, and federal 22resource agencies, such as the U.S. Fish and Wildlife Service, 23and qualified non-profit organizations engaged in aquatic 24habitat restoration as a central part of their mission.25    (e) No general permit adopted under subsection (b), (c), 26or (d) of this Section shall be for a period of more than 5   HB3596- 28 -LRB104 09762 BDA 19828 b1years after the date of its adoption, and the Department shall 2revoke or modify such a general permit, after opportunity for 3public hearing, if the Department determines that the 4activities authorized by the general permit have an adverse 5impact on the environment, cause or contribute to a violation 6of State water quality standards, or are more appropriately 7authorized by individual permits.8    (f) Compliance with the terms of a general permit shall be 9deemed compliance with the provisions of this Act if the 10applicant:11        (1) files a preconstruction notification in accordance 12    with regulations adopted under this Act, including the 13    specific requirements of the general permit;14        (2) files all reports required by the general permit;15        (3) complies with all limitations required by the 16    general permit; and 17        (4) complies with applicable compensatory mitigation 18    requirements.19    (g) The Department may respond to a preconstruction 20notification issued under this Section within 30 days after 21the Department receives the notice. In any response, the 22Department may require the applicant to: 23        (1) provide more information to determine whether the 24    applicant's proposed regulated activity is covered by the 25    general permit; 26        (2) file a preconstruction notification for a   HB3596- 29 -LRB104 09762 BDA 19828 b1    different general permit if the Department determines the 2    applicant's proposed activity is not covered by the 3    general permit for which the notification was filed; or 4        (3) apply for an individual permit if the Department 5    determines that the proposed activity does not fall within 6    the scope of any valid general permit. 7    (h) If a person files a preconstruction discharge 8notification and receives no response under subsection (g) of 9this Section for a general permit that is valid at the time of 10the notification but that general permit is later modified, 11revoked, or expires, that person may proceed as if that 12general permit were still valid for the purposes of the 13project for which the preconstruction discharge notification 14was filed. 15    (i) The Department may require bonds or letters of credit 16in favor of the State, including conditions sufficient to 17secure compliance with conditions and limitations of a permit 18under this Act. 19    Section 35. In lieu fee program; permittee responsible for 20on-site mitigation and mitigation banking.21    (a) The following entities may establish and operate a 22mitigation bank or in lieu fee program consistent with this 23Act and rules implementing this Act:24        (1) State agencies;25        (2) qualified for-profit and non-profit entities; and  HB3596- 30 -LRB104 09762 BDA 19828 b1        (3) units of local government, including, but not 2    limited to, counties, the Metropolitan Water Reclamation 3    District of Greater Chicago (MWRD), soil and water 4    conservation districts, and county forest districts.5    (b) Mitigation banks may be established on public or 6private lands and must be located on sites that possess the 7physical, chemical, and biological characteristics to support 8establishment of the desired aquatic resources and functions, 9such as wetland hydrology.10    A mitigation bank may be approved to provide mitigation 11for impacts to wetlands that have been approved by the Corps of 12Engineers under Section 404 of the federal Clean Water Act, 13for impacts to wetlands under the Illinois Interagency 14Wetlands Policy Act of 1989, or for both. A mitigation bank 15must be approved by the Department in accordance with this Act 16and implementing rules, by an approved county, or by the Corps 17of Engineers in accordance with the process established in 33 18CFR 332.8 and 40 CFR 230.98.19    (c) The requirements for mitigation banks shall include a 20mitigation bank instrument, long-term management and 21protection, monitoring requirements, remedial action 22procedures, reporting requirements, and financial assurances, 23such as performance bonds.24    (d) In lieu fee programs must include (i) an agreement 25between an operating entity listed in subsection (a) and the 26Department that is similar to a mitigation bank instrument,   HB3596- 31 -LRB104 09762 BDA 19828 b1(ii) a time-table, such as a requirement to use funds to design 2and implement restoration projects within 3 years, (iii) 3accounting requirements, including, but not limited to, 4watershed-based accounting, (iv) monitoring requirements, (v) 5reporting requirements, and (vi) financial assurances. Any 6agency in lieu fee program must have provisions that protect 7the integrity of the fund and prevent this funding from being 8reassigned to other uses.9    (e) The permittee is responsible for on-site mitigation as 10approved by the Department on a case-by-case basis in 11accordance with this Act and implementing rules if (i) on-site 12mitigation has a strong likelihood of success, (ii) the 13permittee has a Department approved monitoring plan, and (iii) 14sufficient financial assurances, such as bonds or letters of 15credit in favor of the State, have been provided as required by 16the Department to assure long-term success. 17    Section 40. Rulemaking and reporting.18    (a) The Department shall adopt rules pursuant to the 19Illinois Administrative Procedure Act:20        (1) to implement Sections 25 and 30 of this Act within 21    one year after the effective date of this Act, including: 22            (A) rules for the review, issuance, denial, or 23        issuance with conditions of individual permits; and 24            (B) rules to promulgate, revise, or revoke general 25        permits;  HB3596- 32 -LRB104 09762 BDA 19828 b1        (2) to administer and prioritize use of funding from 2    the Wetlands Protection Fund under Section 60 of this Act;3        (3) to approve mitigation banks and in lieu fee 4    programs under Section 35 of this Act, including:5            (A) criteria that an applicant to operate a 6        mitigation or in lieu fee program under Section 35 of 7        this Act shall meet and that are at least as stringent 8        as the U.S. Army Corps of Engineers requirements set 9        out in 33 CFR Part 332;10            (B) requirements for in lieu fee agreements 11        consistent with subsection (d) of Section 35 of this 12        Act;13            (C) priority for mitigation banks and in lieu fee 14        programs that restore previously existing wetlands and 15        small streams; and16            (D) surety provisions for permittee-responsible 17        on-site mitigation, mitigation banks, and in lieu fee 18        programs;19        (4) to establish, within one year after the effective 20    date of this Act, the procedures under which a 21    governmental body with a stormwater management program 22    under Section 5-1062 of the Counties Code or under Section 23    7h of the Metropolitan Water Reclamation District Act 24    shall be recognized to have met the conditions of 25    subsection (b) of Section 55 of this Act;26        (5) to govern State jurisdictional wetlands   HB3596- 33 -LRB104 09762 BDA 19828 b1    determinations; State jurisdictional wetlands are adjacent 2    to or otherwise have a significant nexus to maintaining 3    the chemical, physical or biological integrity of 4    navigable waters;5        (6) to establish procedures and standards for 6    rebutting a significant nexus presumption under Section 20 7    of this Act; 8        (7) to provide for approval of wetland delineators 9    consistent with subsection (f) of Section 25 of this Act, 10    including recognition of existing county, special 11    district, or U.S. Army Corps of Engineers wetland 12    delineator training programs, approval programs, or both; 13    and14        (8) to otherwise implement and administer this Act.15    (b) The Department may provide by rule for any 16requirements regarding bonds or letters of credit in favor of 17the State, including conditions sufficient to secure 18compliance with conditions and limitations of a permit.19    (c) The Department may consult with the Illinois Water 20Plan Task Force.21    (d) The Department shall seek to create a joint permit 22process with the U.S. Army Corps of Engineers.23    (e) Subject to appropriation, the Department shall do all 24of the following:25        (1) provide a report to the Governor and the Illinois 26    General Assembly regarding implementation of this Act and   HB3596- 34 -LRB104 09762 BDA 19828 b1    recommendations, including legislative proposals, to 2    enhance the effectiveness of this Act;3        (2) provide recommendations to harmonize these 4    wetlands protections with the Illinois Interagency 5    Wetlands Policy Act of 1989; and6        (3) study the impact of federal rollback of protection 7    for waters beyond wetlands, such as ephemeral streams, in 8    Illinois and provide recommendations, including possible 9    legislative proposals, to protect the citizens of Illinois 10    and waters of the State. 11    Section 45. Appeal of final Department decisions; judicial 12review.13    (a) Any permit applicant who has been denied a permit in 14whole or in part, and any person who participated in the permit 15proceeding and who is aggrieved by a decision of the 16Department to grant a permit in whole or in part, may appeal 17the decision to the Director within 60 calendar days of the 18date the permit is granted or denied. In all such appeals, the 19burden of persuasion shall be on the party appealing the 20Department's decision. Appeals shall be in accordance with 21administrative rules set out by the Department, including 22allowed basis for appeals.23    (b) A person who is aggrieved by a final decision made 24under this Act and who has participated in an appeal to the 25Director under subsection (a) of this Section, including   HB3596- 35 -LRB104 09762 BDA 19828 b1parties that have participated in the permit process if a 2permit was granted, may seek judicial review of the Director's 3decision under the Administrative Review Law. 4    Section 50. Investigation; enforcement.5    (a) In accordance with constitutional limitations, the 6Department shall have authority to enter at all reasonable 7times upon any private or public lands for the purpose of 8inspecting and investigating to ascertain compliance and 9possible violations of this Act, implementing rules, or permit 10terms or conditions.11    (b) The civil penalties provided for in this Section may 12be recovered in a civil action that may be instituted in a 13court with jurisdiction over the place where the violation 14occurred. The State's Attorney of the county in which the 15alleged violation occurred, or the Attorney General may, at 16the request of the Department or on the State's Attorney's or 17Attorney General's own motion, institute a civil action in a 18court of competent jurisdiction to recover civil penalties and 19to obtain an injunction to restrain violations of this Act and 20to compel compliance with this Act.21    (c) Any person who violates any provision of this Act, any 22rule adopted under this Act, any permit issued under this Act, 23or any term or condition of a permit issued under this Act 24shall be liable for a civil penalty not to exceed $10,000 per 25day of violation. Any such penalty shall be made payable to the   HB3596- 36 -LRB104 09762 BDA 19828 b1Wetlands Protection Fund and shall be deposited into that Fund 2as provided in Section 60. In assessing a penalty, courts 3shall consider any matters of record including:4        (1) the duration and gravity of the violation;5        (2) the presence or absence of due diligence on the 6    part of the violator in attempting to comply with the Act;7        (3) any economic benefits accrued by the violator 8    through the violation;9        (4) the likely deterrence effect of the penalty;10        (5) any history on the part of the violator of past 11    violations of this Act; and12        (6) a recommendation by the Department to limit or 13    waive penalties.14    (d) All final orders imposing civil penalties under this 15Section shall prescribe the deadline for payment. If such a 16penalty is not paid within the time prescribed, interest on 17the penalty shall be charged at the rate set forth in 18subsection (a) of Section 1003 of the Illinois Income Tax Act 19unless the deadline for payment is stayed by a court pending 20appeal. 21    (e) The Department may terminate a permit if the permittee 22violated the terms or conditions of the permit, obtained the 23permit by misrepresentation, or failed to disclose relevant 24facts. 25    (f) The Attorney General or State's Attorney of the county 26where the affected wetland is located, may, upon his or her own   HB3596- 37 -LRB104 09762 BDA 19828 b1motion or upon request of the Department, institute a civil 2action in circuit court for an injunction or other appropriate 3legal action to restrain a violation of this Act. In the 4proceeding, the court shall determine whether a violation of 5this Act has been committed, and shall enter any order it 6considers necessary to remove the effects of the violation and 7to prevent the violation from occurring, continuing or being 8renewed in the future. An order may include a requirement that 9the violator restore the affected wetland area, including a 10provision that, if the violator does not comply by restoring 11the wetland within a reasonable time, the Department may 12restore the wetland to its condition prior to the violation 13and the violator shall be liable to the Department for the cost 14of the restoration. However, the Department retains the right 15to act to remedy emergency situations, such as threats to 16public safety, and the violator shall be liable to the 17Department for the cost of the restoration.18    (g) Any person, other than the Attorney General or the 19State's Attorney, may file a complaint with the Illinois 20Pollution Control Board against any person allegedly violating 21this Act, any rule adopted under this Act, any permit issued 22under this Act, or any term or condition of a permit issued 23under this Act, or any relevant Board order. The Board shall 24have authority to conduct proceedings upon complaints charging 25such violations of this Act unless the Board determines that 26such complaint is duplicative or frivolous. The Board may   HB3596- 38 -LRB104 09762 BDA 19828 b1impose civil penalties for a violation of this Act as 2described in subsection (c).3    (h) Any penalty assessed under this Act, including costs 4of wetland restoration and any restoration requirement, shall 5be recorded by the clerk of the court as a lien against the 6property and shall not be removed until the penalty is paid or 7the restoration is completed.8    (i) All costs, fees, and expenses in connection with an 9enforcement or restoration action shall be assessed as damages 10against the violator. 11    (j) Enforcement actions under this Section may be 12concurrent or separate. 13    Section 55. County and special district authority.14    (a) Nothing in this Act preempts or denies the right of any 15governmental body with a stormwater management program under 16Section 5-1062 of the Counties Code or a special district with 17a stormwater program under Section 7h of the Metropolitan 18Water Reclamation District Act from controlling or regulating 19activities in any wetlands within the jurisdiction of the 20governmental body.21    (b) Upon the request of a governmental body with a 22stormwater management program under Section 5-1062 of the 23Counties Code or under Section 7h of the Metropolitan Water 24Reclamation District Act, the Director shall, within 30 25calendar days of receiving the written request or, in the case   HB3596- 39 -LRB104 09762 BDA 19828 b1of subsection (d), within 30 calendar days after the effective 2date of this Act, provide a letter of recognition delegating 3permitting authority under this Act to the county or special 4district stormwater program. Subject to subsection (c), the 5letter of recognition shall be provided if the governmental 6body's stormwater management program:7        (1) provides wetlands protections that are consistent 8    with the scope and intent of this Act and that are at least 9    as stringent as those in this Act;10        (2) has an administration and qualified staff to 11    implement the governmental body's stormwater management 12    program; and13        (3) is implementing and enforcing its stormwater 14    management program.15    (c) Activities within or affecting wetlands that occur in 16the jurisdiction of a governmental body with a stormwater 17management program under Section 5-1062 of the Counties Code 18or under Section 7h of the Metropolitan Water Reclamation 19District Act and that meet the requirements of paragraphs (1), 20(2), and (3) of subsection (b) of this Section are deemed to be 21in compliance with the requirements of this Act, but must meet 22those county or special district stormwater management 23requirements, at a minimum. This also applies during the 24period that the Department is considering a county's request 25under subsection (b), but the requirements of this Act do 26apply until the county has requested recognition under   HB3596- 40 -LRB104 09762 BDA 19828 b1subsection (b). 2    (d) Lake, Cook, Kane, McHenry, and DuPage Counties and the 3Metropolitan Water Reclamation District of Greater Chicago are 4deemed to have requested recognition as of the effective date 5of this Act, and their programs are deemed to meet the 6requirements of paragraph (b) of this Section.7    (e) The Director may rescind recognition status, or place 8conditions on recognition status, for any county or special 9district program as set out in administrative rule, if the 10defect with regard to subsection (b) is not resolved. However, 11notwithstanding any other provision of this Section, a county 12or special district delegation will not be revoked or modified 13if the local program remains at least as stringent as it was on 14the effective date of this Act.15    (f) A governmental body with a stormwater management 16program under Section 5-1062 of the Counties Code or under 17Section 7h of the Metropolitan Water Reclamation District Act 18that has obtained recognition by the Director under this 19Section shall submit an annual report to the Director.20    (g) Nothing in this Act shall be construed as a limitation 21or preemption of any home rule power.22    (h) The Department may provide technical assistance and 23grant funding under Section 60 to governmental bodies with 24approved programs under this Section. 25    Section 60. Wetlands Protection Fund.  HB3596- 41 -LRB104 09762 BDA 19828 b1    (a) The Wetlands Protection Fund shall be established as a 2special fund in the State treasury, to be managed by the 3Department, separate and distinct from the General Revenue 4Fund. Any interest earned by the Wetlands Protection Fund 5shall be credited to the Fund. The purpose of the Wetlands 6Protection Fund is to further wetlands and small streams 7protection and management. Its purpose is to supplement, not 8supplant, existing Department resources. The Wetlands 9Protection Fund may not be used to pay for compensatory 10mitigation obligations under this Act.11    (b) Pursuant to Section 50, all penalties collected by the 12Department under this Act shall be deposited into the Wetlands 13Protection Fund.14    (c) The Illinois General Assembly may appropriate 15additional moneys to the Wetlands Protection Fund to implement 16this Act.17    (d) The Department shall use the moneys in the Wetlands 18Protection Fund to further wetlands and small streams 19protection and management. Eligible uses of moneys in the Fund 20include:21        (1) providing technical assistance and grant funding 22    to counties or special districts with approved programs 23    under Section 55 to restore, preserve, enhance, protect, 24    or maintain wetlands, streams, and upland buffers, 25    particularly Class I areas or wetlands, waters, and 26    buffers that provide floodwater storage and flood risk   HB3596- 42 -LRB104 09762 BDA 19828 b1    reduction;2        (2) supplementing other State, local, or private 3    funding for non-compensatory wetlands and small streams 4    restoration, enhancement, preservation and maintenance;5        (3) providing matching funds for wetland and stream 6    inventories, mapping, watershed planning and wetland 7    program development grants; and8        (4) covering staffing, administrative, and enforcement 9    costs for the Department to implement this Act. 10    Section 65. Review fee. All inquiries to determine whether 11or not the proposed activity requires permit authorization by 12the Department under this Act will be reviewed by the 13Department free of charge. A permit review fee that is to be 14set by the Department by rule is required for all permit 15applications under this Act. The Department shall establish a 16graduated review fee payment schedule depending on the 17intensity of required review and the size of the individual 18project. Accordingly, the highest review fees will be charged 19for individual permits to authorize major projects. The 20Department may, by rule, impose a reasonable fee for wetlands 21delineation and classification. 22    Section 90. The State Finance Act is amended by adding 23Section 5.1030 as follows:   HB3596- 43 -LRB104 09762 BDA 19828 b1    (30 ILCS 105/5.1030 new)2    Sec. 5.1030. The Wetlands Protection Fund. 3    Section 97. Severability. The provisions of this Act are 4severable under Section 1.31 of the Statute on Statutes.". 5    Section 99. Effective date. This Act takes effect upon 6becoming law.  HB3596- 44 -LRB104 09762 BDA 19828 b1 INDEX 2 Statutes amended in order of appearance 3    New Act4    30 ILCS 105/5.1030 new